Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-501
Sections, purpose; how construed.

Sections 66-501 to 66-512 and 66-525 to 66-531 are for the purpose of aiding in the administration and enforcement of the motor fuel laws of this state. Such sections shall not be construed to apply to any person transporting motor vehicle fuel or diesel fuel within the State of Nebraska if such fuel is for such person's own agricultural, quarrying, industrial, or other nonhighway use.

Laws 1935, c. 130, § 1, p. 462;

Laws 1937, c. 146, § 1, p. 558;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-801;

R.S.1943, § 66-501;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 62;

Laws 1993, LB 440, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 81.